California statutes. Education Code
 made under the penalties of perjury.(Signature)The school board may require the furnishing of additional information as it deems necessary to make the determination that the use of school property for which application is made would not violate Section 38135.

Any person applying for the use of school property on behalf of any society, group, or organization shall be a member of the applicant group and, unless he or she is an officer of
 the group, must present written authorization from the applicant group to make the application.

The governing board of any school district may, in its discretion, consider any statement of information or written authorization made pursuant to the requirements of this section as being continuing in effect for the purposes of this section for the period of one year from the date of the statement of information or written authorization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38137.

Written statements of information as required by Section 38136 need not be under oath, but shall contain a written declaration that they are made under the penalty of perjury, and any person so signing the statements who willfully states therein as true any material matter which he or she knows to be false, is subject to the penalties prescribed for perjury in the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38138.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this article or any other provisions of law, when a nonpartisan charitable organization organized under the laws of this state has constructed or will construct, subject to the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 39140) of Chapter 2 of this part, a school athletic and youth center facility at no cost to a school district, upon a school-district-owned site to be owned by and for the benefit of the school occupying the site, the governing board of the school district, in accepting the donation and prescribing the
 conditions and restrictions with respect thereto, may permit the general use of the facility under the provisions of this article for specified supervised recreational activities which are sponsored by or conducted by the donor organization, and may also permit the donor organization to use the facility for this purpose at times when the facility is not being used by the school district for the educational program and related school activities of the designated beneficiary school, unless the use and occupancy of the facility by the donor organization would otherwise interfere with the regular conduct of the school. Any use granted to the donor organization shall, however, immediately and forever terminate if the donor organization denies the use of the facility to any person because of their race, religion, creed, national origin, ancestry, or sex. 

This section shall apply only to elementary school districts in San Diego County which had an average daily attendance
 of 425 or less during the 1970–71 school year, and which, during the 1970–71 school year, had a modified assessed valuation per pupil in average daily attendance of between forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000) and fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38139.

(a) Public primary schools shall post at an appropriate area restricted to adults information regarding missing children provided by the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 14210 of the Penal Code.

(b) Public secondary schools shall post at an appropriate area information regarding missing children provided by the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 14210 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 437, Sec. 1.   (SB 1066)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 23.5. TRANSPORTATION [39800. - 40090.5.]



  CHAPTER 1. Transportation Services [39800. - 39882.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [39800. - 39809.5.]

39800.

(a) The governing board of any school district may provide for the transportation of pupils to and from school whenever in the judgment of the board the transportation is advisable and good reasons exist therefor. The governing board may purchase or rent and provide for the upkeep, care, and operation of vehicles, or may contract and pay for the transportation of pupils to and from school by common carrier or municipally owned transit system, or may contract with and pay responsible private parties for the transportation. These contracts may be made with the parent or guardian of the pupil being transported. A governing board may allow the transportation of preschool or nursery school pupils in schoolbuses owned or operated by the district. A state reimbursement may not be received by a district for the transportation of preschool or nursery school pupils.

(b) As used in this article, “municipally owned transit system” means a transit system owned by a city, or by a district created under Part 1 (commencing with Section 24501) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

39800.1.

(a) As a condition of receiving apportionments under Section 41850.1, a local educational agency shall develop a plan describing the transportation services it will offer to its pupils, and how it will prioritize planned transportation services for pupils in transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, and any of grades 1 to 6, inclusive, and pupils who are low income. The plan shall be adopted by the local educational agency’s governing board on or before April 1, 2023, and updated by April 1 each year thereafter. The plan shall include the following components:

(1) A description of the local educational agency’s transportation services that would be accessible to pupils with disabilities and homeless children and youth, as defined pursuant to the federal
 McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11301 et seq.).

(2) A description of how unduplicated pupils, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 42238.02, would be able to access available home-to-school transportation at no cost to the pupils.

(b) (1) The plan shall be developed in consultation with classified staff, teachers, school administrators, regional local transit authorities, local air pollution control districts and air quality management districts, parents, pupils, and other stakeholders.

(2) The plan shall be presented and adopted by the governing board of the local educational agency in an open meeting with the opportunity for in-person and remote public comment.

(c) The plan may provide for the local
 educational agency to partner with a municipally owned transit system to provide service pursuant to this section to middle school and high school pupils.

(d) Nothing in a local educational agency’s plan shall preclude a local educational agency from providing no-cost transit passes to pupils.

(e) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, excluding a school district with a districtwide charter petition approved pursuant to Section 47606, or a county office of education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 19.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

39800.5.

(a) Any school district and any owner or operator of a private school that provides transportation for pupils that owns, leases, or otherwise has possession or control of a 15-passenger van, may not, on or after January 1, 2005, authorize the operation of that van for the purpose of transporting passengers unless the person driving or otherwise operating that van has both of the following:

(1) A valid class B driver’s license, as provided in Division 6 (commencing with Section 12500) of the Vehicle Code, issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(2) An endorsement for operating a passenger transportation vehicle, as provided in Article 6 (commencing with Section 15275) of Chapter 7 of Division 6 of the Vehicle Code, issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), for purposes of this section, a “15-passenger van” means any van manufactured to accommodate 15 passengers, including the driver, regardless of whether that van has been altered to accommodate fewer than 15 passengers.

(2) For purposes of this section, a “15-passenger van” does not mean a 15-passenger van with dual rear wheels that has a gross weight rating equal to, or greater than, 11,500 pounds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 559, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

39801.

The governing board of any school district may contract with the county superintendent of schools to provide necessary transportation services. The county superintendent of schools, acting pursuant to the contract, shall have all the powers and duties granted to governing boards by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

39801.5.

(a) The governing board of any school district may contract for the transportation of matriculated or enrolled adults, or provide transportation to adults in district-owned equipment for educational purposes other than to and from school.

(b) Any district that contracts to provide or provides transportation to adults pursuant to this section may charge adults all or part of the costs of contracting for or providing transportation services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

39802.

In order to procure the service at the lowest possible figure consistent with proper and satisfactory service, the governing board shall, whenever an expenditure of more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) is involved, secure bids pursuant to Sections 20111 and 20112 of the Public Contract Code whenever it is contemplated that a contract may be made with a person or corporation other than a common carrier or a municipally owned transit system or a parent or guardian of the pupils to be transported. The governing board may let the contract for the service to other than the lowest bidder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

39803.

(a) If a continuing contract for the furnishing of transportation of pupils in school districts to and from school is made it shall be made for a term not to exceed five years. A contract is renewable at the option of the school district and the party contracting to provide transportation services, jointly, at the end of the term of the contract. The contract as renewed shall include all of the terms and conditions of the previous contract, including any provisions increasing rates based on increased costs.

(b) A continuing contract may be made for the lease or rental of schoolbuses, not to exceed five years, except that if a lease or rental contract provides that the district may exercise an option either to purchase the buses or to cancel the lease at the end of each annual period during the period of the contract, the contract may be made for a term not to exceed 10 years.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, a continuing contract executed under the provisions of this section may be negotiated annually within the contract period when economic factors indicate negotiation is necessary to maintain an equitable pricing structure. Renegotiation is subject to the approval of both contracting parties.

(d) Any rental, lease, or lease-purchase of a schoolbus shall comply with all applicable provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 17450) of Chapter 4 of Part 10.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

39803.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 39803 or any other law, this section shall apply to the furnishing of transportation of pupils in local educational agencies to and from school using schoolbuses that are zero-emission vehicles and for the lease or rental of schoolbuses that are zero-emission vehicles.

(b) If a continuing contract for the furnishing of transportation of pupils in local educational agencies to and from school is made, it shall be made for a term not to exceed 15 years. A contract is renewable at the option of the local educational agency and the party contracting to provide transportation services, jointly, at the end of the term of the contract. The
 contract as renewed shall include all of the terms and conditions of the previous contract, including any provisions increasing rates based on increased costs.

(c) A continuing contract may be made for the lease or rental of schoolbuses, not to exceed 15 years, except that if a lease or rental contract provides that the local educational agency may exercise an option either to purchase the buses or to cancel the lease at the end of each annual period during the period of the contract, the contract may be made for a term not to exceed 20 years.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a continuing contract executed under this section may be negotiated annually within the contract period when economic factors indicate negotiation is necessary to maintain an
 equitable pricing structure. Renegotiation is subject to the approval of both contracting parties.

(e) Any rental, lease, or lease-purchase of a schoolbus shall comply with all applicable provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 17450) of Chapter 4 of Part 10.5 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(f) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(g) This section is effective January 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 445, Sec. 3.   (AB 579)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

39805.

In bidding on contracts to be made pursuant to Section 39803, bidders may include in their bids abstractions of their quotations indicating the pricing structure used to compute the annual lease or rental payments for the sole purpose of identifying that portion of each annual lease or rental payment which may represent tax exemption reimbursement to the vendor, lessor or to their assignees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

39806.

In lieu of providing in whole or in part for the transportation of a pupil attending the schools of a district, the governing board may pay to the parents or guardian of the pupil a sum not to exceed the cost of actual and necessary travel incurred in transporting the pupil to and from the regular day schools of the district. A payment may not be made pursuant to this section unless it will be more economical to make the payments than to provide for said transportation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

39807.

In lieu of furnishing transportation to pupils attending the schools of a school district, the governing board may pay to the parents or guardian of each pupil the cost of food and lodging of the pupil at a place convenient to the schools. The amount paid on account of each pupil may not exceed the estimated cost to the district of providing for the transportation of the pupil to and from his or her home and the school he or she attends.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

39807.5.

(a) When a local educational agency provides for the transportation of pupils to and from schools, including the governing board of a school district pursuant to Section 39800, or between the regular full-time day schools they would attend and the regular full-time occupational training classes attended by them as provided by a regional
 occupational center or program, the governing board may require the parents and guardians of all or some of the pupils transported, to pay a portion of the cost of this transportation in an amount determined by the governing board.

(b) The amount determined by the governing board pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be no greater than the statewide average nonsubsidized cost of providing this transportation to a pupil on a publicly owned or operated transit system as determined by the Superintendent, in cooperation with the Department of Transportation.

(c) For purposes of this section, “nonsubsidized cost” means actual operating costs less federal subventions.

(d) The governing board shall exempt from these charges pupils of parents and guardians who are
 unduplicated pupils, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 42238.02. Nothing in this provision shall prevent the governing board from providing transportation services at no cost.

(e) A charge under this section may not be made for the transportation of individuals with exceptional needs as defined in Section 56026.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to sanction, perpetuate, or promote the racial or ethnic segregation of pupils in the schools.

(g) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district or a county office of education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 15.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

39808.

(a) The governing board of any school district may allow a pupil entitled to attend the school of the district, but who, under Section 48222, attends a school other than a public school to be transported upon the same terms, in the same manner, and over the same routes of travel as is permitted pupils attending the district school.

(b) The allowance provided for in this section shall be restricted to actual transportation when furnished by the district to pupils attending the district school, and nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize or permit in lieu of transportation payments of money to parents or guardians of pupils attending private schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

39809.5.

(a) The sum of the state aid received and the parent fees collected in a fiscal year may not exceed actual operating cost of home-to-school transportation in that fiscal year.

(b) If excess fees are collected due to errors in estimated costs, fees shall be reduced in succeeding years.

(c) The governing board shall certify to the county superintendent that districts have levied fees in accordance with law, and that fees have been reduced and excess fee revenue eliminated whenever excess fees have been charged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. State Reimbursement [39820. - 39820.]

39820.

Notwithstanding any other law, the governing board of a school district may provide for the transportation to and from public school of pupils who have attained the age of three years and nine months and are enrolled in classes established pursuant to Chapter 4.45 (commencing with Section 56440) of Part 30 of Division 4 whenever in the judgment of the governing board of a school district, transportation is advisable and good reasons exist. A governing board of a school district may allow for the transportation of parents of pupils enrolled in these classes for the purpose of accompanying their children to and from the attendance center offering the early primary classes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 538, Sec. 12.   (SB 416)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Schoolbuses [39830. - 39843.]

39830.

A schoolbus is any motor vehicle designed, used, or maintained for the transportation of a school pupil at or below the grade 12 level to or from a public or private school or to or from public or private school activities, except the following:

(a) A motor vehicle of any type carrying only members of the household of its owner.

(b) A motortruck transporting pupils who are seated only in the passenger compartment, and a passenger vehicle designed for and when actually carrying not more than 10 persons, including the driver, except any vehicle or truck transporting two or more pupils who use wheelchairs.

(c) A motor vehicle operated by a common carrier, or by and under exclusive jurisdiction of a publicly owned or operated transit system, only during the time it is on a scheduled run and is available to the general public or on a run scheduled in response to a request from a pupil who uses a wheelchair, or from a parent of the pupil, for transportation to or from nonschool activities. However, the motor vehicle is designed for and actually carries not more than 16 persons and the driver, is available to eligible persons of the general public, and the school does not provide the requested transportation service.

(d) A school pupil activity bus as defined in Section 39830.1.

(e) A motor vehicle operated by a carrier licensed by the Interstate Commerce Commission that is transporting pupils on a school activity entering or returning to the state from another state or country.

(f) A state-owned motor vehicle being operated by a state employee upon the driveways, paths, parking facilities, or grounds specified in Section 21113 of the Vehicle Code that are under the control of a state hospital under the jurisdiction of the State Department of Developmental Services where the posted speed limit is not more than 20 miles per hour. The motor vehicle may also be operated for a distance of not more than one-quarter mile upon a public street or highway that runs through the grounds of a state hospital under the jurisdiction of the State Department of Developmental Services, if the posted speed limit on the public street or highway is not more than 25 miles per hour and if all traffic is regulated by posted stop signs or official traffic control signals at the points of entry and exit by the motor vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 569, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

39830.1.

A “school pupil activity bus” means any motor vehicle, other than a schoolbus, operated by a common carrier, or by and under the exclusive jurisdiction of a publicly owned or operated transit system, or by a passenger charter-party carrier, used under a contractual agreement between a school and carrier to transport school pupils at or below the 12th grade level to or from a public or private school activity, or used to transport pupils to or from residential schools, when the pupils are received and discharged at off-highway locations where a parent or adult designated by the parent is present to accept the pupil or place the pupil on the bus. As used in this section, “common carrier,” “publicly owned or operated transit system,” and “passenger charter-party carrier” mean carriers in business for the principal purpose of transporting members of the public on a commercial basis. This section shall not apply to a motor vehicle operated by a carrier licensed by the Interstate Commerce Commission transporting pupils on a school activity trip entering or returning to the state from another state or country.

The driver of a school pupil activity bus shall be subject to the regulations adopted by the Department of the California Highway Patrol governing schoolbus drivers, except that the regulations shall not require drivers to duplicate training or schooling that they have otherwise received that is equivalent to that required pursuant to the regulations, and the regulations may not require drivers to take training in first aid. However, a valid certificate to drive a school pupil activity bus does not entitle the bearer to drive a schoolbus.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

39831.

(a) The State Board of Education shall adopt reasonable regulations relating to the use of schoolbuses by school districts and others. The regulations may not govern the safe operation of schoolbuses that shall be adopted instead by the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(b) The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall adopt regulations pursuant to Section 34500 of the Vehicle Code relating to the safe operation of schoolbuses that shall also require school district governing boards to include in their schoolbus driver training programs, the proper actions to be taken in the event that a schoolbus is hijacked.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

39831.1.

The state board shall adopt regulations to require a passenger in a schoolbus equipped with passenger restraint systems in accordance with Section 27316 of the Vehicle Code to use a passenger restraint system so that the passenger is properly restrained by that system.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 38047.5 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 75.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

39831.2.

The state board shall adopt regulations to require a passenger in a school pupil activity bus equipped with passenger restraint systems in accordance with Section 27316.5 of the Vehicle Code to use a passenger restraint system so that the passenger is properly restrained by that system.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 38047.6 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 76.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

39831.3.

(a) The county superintendent of schools, the superintendent of a school district, a charter school, or the owner or operator of a private school that provides transportation to or from a school or school activity shall prepare a transportation safety plan containing procedures for school personnel to follow to ensure the safe transport of pupils. The plan shall be revised as required. The plan shall address all of the following:

(1) Determining if pupils require escort pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 22112 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) (A) Procedures for
 all pupils in prekindergarten, kindergarten, and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, to follow as they board and exit the appropriate schoolbus at each pupil’s schoolbus stop.

(B) Nothing in this paragraph requires a county superintendent of schools, the superintendent of a school district, a charter school, or the owner or operator of a private school that provides transportation to or from a school or school activity, to use the services of an onboard schoolbus monitor, in addition to the driver, to carry out the purposes of this paragraph.

(3) Boarding and exiting a schoolbus at a school or other trip destination.

(4) Procedures to ensure that a pupil is not left unattended on a schoolbus, school pupil activity bus, or youth
 bus.

(5) Procedures and standards for designating an adult chaperone, other than the driver, to accompany pupils on a school pupil activity bus. 

(b) A current copy of a plan prepared pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be retained by each school subject to the plan and made available upon request to an officer of the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 721, Sec. 2.   (SB 1072)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

39831.5.

(a) All pupils in prekindergarten, kindergarten, and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, in public or private school who are transported in a schoolbus or school pupil activity bus shall receive instruction in schoolbus emergency procedures and passenger safety. The county superintendent of schools, superintendent of the school district, or owner/operator of a private school, as applicable, shall ensure that the instruction is provided as follows:

(1) Upon registration, the parents or guardians of all pupils not previously transported in a schoolbus or school pupil activity bus and who are in prekindergarten, kindergarten, and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, shall be provided with written information on schoolbus safety. The information shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) A list of schoolbus stops near each pupil’s home.

(B) General rules of conduct at schoolbus loading zones.

(C) Red light crossing instructions.

(D) Schoolbus danger zone.

(E) Walking to and from schoolbus stops.

(2) At least once in each school year, all pupils in prekindergarten, kindergarten, and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, who receive home-to-school transportation shall receive safety instruction that includes, but is not limited to, proper loading and unloading procedures, including escorting by the driver, how to safely cross the street, highway, or private road, instruction on the use of passenger restraint systems, as described in paragraph (3), proper passenger conduct, bus evacuation, and location of emergency equipment. Instruction also may include responsibilities of passengers seated next to an emergency exit. As part of the instruction, pupils shall evacuate the schoolbus through emergency exit doors.

(3) Instruction on the use of passenger restraint systems, when a passenger restraint system is installed, shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Proper fastening and release of the passenger restraint system.

(B) Acceptable placement of passenger restraint systems on pupils.

(C) Times at which the passenger restraint systems should be fastened and released.

(D) Acceptable placement of the passenger restraint systems when not in use.

(4) Prior to departure on a school activity trip, all pupils riding on a schoolbus or school pupil activity bus shall receive safety instruction that includes, but is not limited to, location of emergency exits, and location and use of emergency equipment. Instruction also may include responsibilities of passengers seated next to an emergency exit.

(b) The following information shall be documented each time the instruction required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) is given:

(1) Name of school district, county office of education, or private school.

(2) Name and location of school.

(3) Date of instruction.

(4) Names of supervising adults.

(5) Number of pupils participating.

(6) Grade levels of pupils.

(7) Subjects covered in instruction.

(8) Amount of time taken for instruction.

(9) Busdriver’s name.

(10) Bus number.

(11) Additional remarks.

The information recorded pursuant to this subdivision shall remain on file at the district or county office, or at the school, for one year from the date of the instruction, and shall be subject to inspection by the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 552, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

39832.

The name or names of the particular school or schools to which a schoolbus conveys pupils may be painted on the side of the bus, in the manner prescribed by the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

39833.

Any officer, agent, or employee of a school district, or any other person knowingly operating, or permitting or directing the operation of a schoolbus in violation of any regulation or order of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and any person knowingly operating a schoolbus without possessing the qualifications required by the Department of the California Highway Patrol for schoolbus operators, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

39834.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any officer, agent, or employee of a school district, office of the county superintendent of schools, or joint powers agency, or any other person, knowingly operating, or permitting or directing the operation of a schoolbus, when it is loaded with schoolchildren in excess of the limits of its seating capacity, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) The governing board of any school district, office of the county superintendent of schools, or joint powers agency may adopt a district policy establishing plans for the evacuation of pupils in case of any emergency that may provide, where necessary, for the loading of schoolchildren on a schoolbus in excess of the limits of its seating capacity.

(c) As used in this section, “emergency” means a natural disaster or hazard that requires pupils to be moved immediately in order to ensure their safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

39835.

(a) The governing board of any school district may use schoolbuses to transport persons for purposes of community recreation as provided in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 10900) of Part 7. The transportation may be provided on any day or days throughout the school year.

(b) Any school district that files forms with the Superintendent of Public Instruction covering the annual report of transportation expense in connection with reimbursement for transportation shall show on the forms the total mileage of schoolbuses used in providing transportation for community recreation purposes. The Superintendent of Public Instruction, in accordance with regulations adopted by him or her, shall deduct from the allowances to a school district for transportation an amount equal to the depreciation of schoolbuses due to their use in transporting persons for community recreation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

39836.

During any national emergency declared by the President of the United States of America or during any war in which the United States of America is engaged, the governing board of a school district may operate any bus owned or under lease to the district for the transportation of pupils of the district engaged in the harvesting of crops to and from the places of harvest and shall require the payment of a reasonable charge for transportation furnished.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

39837.

The governing board of any school district may use and operate any bus owned or under lease to the district for the transportation of pupils to and from their places of employment during the summer in connection with any summer employment program for youth. The governing board shall require the payment of a reasonable charge for transportation so furnished. The governing board shall, in accordance with Section 35208, adequately insure against the liability of the district, members of the board, and officers and employees of the district in connection with the furnishing of transportation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

39837.5.

The governing board of a school district may provide for the transportation on schoolbuses of employees of the school district, parents of pupils of the school district, and adult volunteers to and from educational activities authorized by the school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 173, Sec. 1.   (AB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

39838.

(a) Each schoolbus shall be equipped with one or more fire extinguishers bearing the approval of the laboratories of the National Board of Fire Underwriters, Underwriters’ Laboratories Incorporated, or any other nationally recognized testing laboratory, and located in an easily accessible place in the driver’s compartment.

(b) Each schoolbus shall be equipped with one or more fire extinguishers with an aggregate rating of at least 8-B, C units, as rated by the Underwriters’ Laboratories Incorporated. Carbon tetrachloride fire extinguishers may not be used on schoolbuses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

39839.

Guide dogs, signal dogs, and service dogs trained to provide assistance to individuals with a disability may be transported in a schoolbus when accompanied by disabled pupils enrolled in a public or private school or by disabled teachers employed in a public or private school or community college or by persons training the dogs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

39840.

The governing board of any school district may enter into a contract under the terms of which the school district grants the use of any schoolbus that is owned or leased by the school district to any federal, state, or local governmental agency for the purpose of providing transportation for employees of the agency to or from their places of employment, or both, if the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) Public transportation is not reasonably available to the agency’s employees at their place of employment.

(b) The school district normally provides transportation for pupils residing on the governmental agency’s property to or from school, or both.

(c) The transportation of the agency’s employees does not interfere with the school district’s use of schoolbuses for school transportation purposes.

(d) All schoolbus warning lights and exterior lettering or signs that identify the bus as a schoolbus are covered or removed during operation by the federal, state, or local governmental agency.

(e) Mechanical condition of a schoolbus during operation by the federal, state, or local governmental agency is maintained so as to meet or exceed those regulations promulgated by the State Department of Education pursuant to Section 39831 governing the operation of schoolbuses.

(f) Accurate records are maintained that reflect the actual number of miles any schoolbus is driven during times of operation by the federal, state, or local governmental agency, which records are to be made available to the Superintendent of Public Instruction in connection with the annual report of transportation expense made by the school district. The Superintendent of Public Instruction, in accordance with Section 39835, shall deduct from the allowances to a school district for transportation an amount equal to the depreciation of schoolbuses due to their use in transporting employees of a federal, state, or local governmental agency pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

39841.

The following requirements shall be included in any agreement entered into between a school district and a publicly owned transit system under which the school district grants the use of any schoolbus that is owned or leased by it to the transit system for public transportation purposes:

(a) All schoolbus warning lights and exterior lettering or signs that identify the bus as a schoolbus are covered or removed during operation by the transit system.
